Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Highway Traffic Regulation Law – Rules of the Road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-3.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8282; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-5.
Application of provisions of chapter relating to operation of vehicles.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the operation of vehicles refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon highways except:

1. Where a different place is specifically referred to in a given section.

2. The provisions of Articles 9 and 25 shall apply upon highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8145; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-7.
Compilation, printing and distribution of provisions of chapter.

The Commissioner of Public Safety is hereby authorized and directed to compile in a condensed form the Rules of the Road as set out by this chapter and have sufficient copies printed in pocket size booklet form. The booklets shall be made available to the various law enforcement departments, other agencies and members of the public. The Department of Public Safety may charge another department or agency an amount not exceeding the actual costs incurred by the department in compiling, printing and distributing the booklets; however, no charge may be made by the Department of Public Safety or any other department or agency for distribution of the booklets to the public. The Department of Public Safety also may compile a condensed form of the “Rules of the Road” in electronic format, which shall be accessible by law enforcement departments, other agencies and the public without charge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8284; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2002, ch. 446, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 63-3-9.
Teaching of provisions of chapter in public schools.

The provisions of this chapter shall be taught in the eighth grade of each and every public school of this state. The state superintendent of public education and the county superintendent of each county are hereby directed and required to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8285; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-11.
Right to recover damages in civil suit unaffected by provisions of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to curtail or abridge the right of any person to prosecute a civil suit for damages by reason of injuries to person or property resulting from the negligent use of the highways by any motor vehicle, or its owner, or his employee or agent.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5785; 1930, § 5588; 1942, § 1742; Laws, 1916, ch. 116.